Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.385

Effect of merger.

(1) When a merger takes effect:

(a) Every other partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation that is party to the merger merges into the surviving partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation and the separate existence of every partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation except the surviving partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation ceases;

(b) The title to all real estate and other property owned by each partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, and corporation party to the merger is vested in the surviving partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation without reversion or impairment;

(c) The surviving partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation has all liabilities of each partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, and corporation that is party to the merger;

(d) A proceeding pending against any partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation that is party to the merger may be continued as if the merger did not occur or the surviving partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation may be substituted in the proceeding for the partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation whose existence ceased;

(e) The certificate of formation of the surviving limited liability company is amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger;

(f) The partnership agreement of the surviving limited partnership is amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger;

(g) The articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger; and

(h) The former members of every limited liability company party to the merger, the former holders of the partnership interests of every domestic partnership or limited partnership that is party to the merger, and the former holders of the shares of every domestic corporation that is party to the merger are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of merger, or to their rights under this article, to their rights under RCW 25.10.831 through 25.10.886, or to their rights under chapter 23B.13 RCW.

(2) Unless otherwise agreed, a merger of a domestic partnership, including a domestic partnership which is not the surviving entity in the merger, shall not require the domestic partnership to wind up its affairs under article 8 of this chapter.

(3) Unless otherwise agreed, a merger of a domestic limited partnership, including a domestic limited partnership which is not the surviving entity in the merger, shall not require the domestic limited partnership to wind up its affairs under RCW 25.10.581 or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets under RCW 25.10.621.

(4) Unless otherwise agreed, a merger of a domestic limited liability company, including a domestic limited liability company which is not the surviving entity in the merger, shall not require the domestic limited liability company to wind up its affairs under RCW 25.15.297 or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets under RCW 25.15.305.

[ 2015 c 188 s 115; 2009 c 188 s 1407; 1998 c 103 s 908.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 188: See RCW 25.15.903.

Effective date—2009 c 188: See note following RCW 23B.13.020.